District of Columbia statutes.
2-1594

Commission; establishment; authority.

(a)

There is established the Statewide Commission on Children, Youth, and their Families.

(b)

Unless expressly prohibited in law or regulation, the Commission shall have the authority to:

(1)

Combine local, federal, and other resources available to the participating education, law enforcement, and human services agencies to provide comprehensive multi-disciplinary assessments, integrated services, and evidence-based programs, as required by this subchapter;

(2)

Apply for, receive, and disburse federal, state, and local funds relating to the duties and responsibilities of the Commission;

(3)

Utilize the funding provided pursuant to subchapter III-A of Chapter 13 of Title 4 [§ 4-1345.01 et seq.];

(4)

Exercise personnel authority for all employees of the Commission, consistent with Chapter 6 of Title 1 [§ 1-601.01 et seq.]; and

(5)

Exercise procurement authority, consistent with Chapter 3A of this title [§ 2-351.01 et seq.]; except, that § 2-352.01(a) shall not apply.

June 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-9, § 504, 54 DCR 4102
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 4061(c), 57 DCR 181
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 207, 59 DCR 6190

Section 5072 of D.C. Law 19-168 provided for the establishment of the Safe Children and Families Enrichment Services Task Force.

Section 5073 of D.C. Law 19-168 provided that §§ 5071 and 5072 of the act shall expire 6 months after September 20, 2012.

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4061(c) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4061(c) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 substituted “Chapter 3A of this title; except, that § 2-352.01(a) shall not apply” for “Unit A of Chapter 3 of Title 2; except, that the provisions of § 2-301.05(a), (b), (c), and (e) shall not apply” in (b)(5).
D.C. Law 18-111, in subsec. (a), substituted “the Statewide Commission on Children, Youth, and their Families” for “an Interagency Collaboration and Services Integration Commission”.
This section is referenced in § 2-1592 and § 38-271.02.